Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB86.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2.1(a) and (b) of the act of May 22, 1951 (P.L.317, No.69), known as The Professional Nursing Law, are amended to read:Section 2.1. State Board of Nursing.--(a) The State Board of Nursing shall consist of the Commissioner of Professional and Occupational Affairs, three members appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of a majority of the members elected to the Senate, who shall be persons representing the public at large, and nine members appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of a majority of the members elected to the Senate, six of whom shall be registered nurses, graduated from 123456789101112131415161718192021 schools of nursing where practical and theoretical instruction is given, at least three of whom shall possess Masters' degrees in nursing, two of whom shall be licensed practical nurses and one of whom shall be a licensed dietitian-nutritionist, and all of whom shall have been engaged in nursing or the practice of dietetics-nutrition in this Commonwealth for the five-year period immediately preceding appointment and shall be residents of this Commonwealth. The dietitian-nutritionist member of the board initially appointed need not be licensed by the licensure examination adopted by the board but, at the time of appointment, must have satisfied the education and experience requirements of this act for licensure as a dietitian-nutritionist. In making appointments to the Board, the Governor shall give due consideration to providing representation from diversified fields of nursing or dietetics-nutrition, including, but not limited to, specialized nurses or dietitian-nutritionists of all types. The persons representing the public at large may not have a financial interest in the provision of goods and services for dietitian-nutritionists and may not be a dietitian-nutritionist or have a household member who is a dietitian-nutritionist.(b) The terms of the members of the Board shall be [six] four years or until his or her successor has been appointed and qualified but not longer than six months beyond the [six-year] four-year period. In the event that any of said members shall die or resign or otherwise become disqualified during his or her term, his or her successor shall be appointed in the same way and with the same qualifications and shall hold office for the unexpired term. No member shall be eligible for appointment to serve more than two consecutive terms.20250HB0086PN0069 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0086PN0069 - 3 - 12